Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.309

Remedies available after distribution.

(1) A claim against a dissolved limited liability company is barred if the limited liability company has filed a certificate of dissolution under RCW 25.15.269 that has not been revoked under RCW 25.15.294, and an action or other proceeding thereon is not commenced within three years after the filing of the certificate of dissolution.

(2) The dissolution of a limited liability company does not take away or impair any remedy available to or, except as provided in subsection (1) of this section or RCW 25.15.301, against that limited liability company, its managers, or its members for any right or claim existing, or any liability incurred at any time, whether prior to or after dissolution. Such an action or proceeding by or against the limited liability company may be prosecuted or defended by the limited liability company in its own name.

[ 2015 c 188 s 61.]